Massachusetts, session 194th, S1405.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 55 of Chapter 52 of the Acts of 2016, as amended by Chapter 351 
of the Acts of 2016, is hereby repealed. 
SECTION 2. Section 77 of Chapter 52 of the Acts of 2016 is hereby repealed.